liblouis-back-translation-tables/ml-in-g3-abk.utb
always \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D35 346-13
always \x0D16\x0D4D\x0D35 346-46
always \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1245
always \x0D18\x0D4D\x0D35 346-126
always \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D35 346-346
always \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D35 346-14
always \x0D1B\x0D4D\x0D35 346-16
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D35 346-245
always \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D35 346-25
always \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D35 346-23456
always \x0D20\x0D4D\x0D35 346-2456
always \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1246
always \x0D22\x0D4D\x0D35 346-123456
always \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D35 346-3456
always \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D35 346-2345
always \x0D25\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1456
always \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D35 346-145
always \x0D27\x0D4D\x0D35 346-2346
always \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1345
always \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1234
always \x0D2B\x0D4D\x0D35 346-235
always \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D35 346-12
always \x0D2D\x0D4D\x0D35 346-45
always \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D35 346-134
always \x0D30\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1235
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D35 346-123
always \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35 346-1236
always \x0D36\x0D4D\x0D35 346-146
always \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D35 346-12346
always \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D35 346-234
always \x0D39\x0D4D\x0D35 346-125
always \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D35 346-456
always \x0D34\x0D4D\x0D35 346-12356
always \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D35 346-12456

### Section 11 

### To be fixed - 123456 R disabled
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x200D 1356  
midendword \x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 124-124

### Section 12 - Dot-6 
midendword \x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 6-345
midendword \x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 6-345-246
midendword \x0D3F\x0D30\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 6-24
midendword \x0D3F\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 6-345-246
midendword \x0D41\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 6-136
midendword \x0D28\x0D3E\x0D2F 6-34
midendword \x0D1A\x0D46\x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D24 6-14
midendword \x0D15\x0D3F\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 6-2456
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D32 6-1234
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 6-13456
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x200D\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 6-123

### Section 13 - Dot-4
midendword \x0D3E\x0D35\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 4-345
midendword \x0D3F\x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32 4-24
midendword \x0D41\x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33 4-136
midendword \x0D46\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3F\x0D32 4-26
midendword \x0D2E\x0D3E\x0D2F 4-34
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D34 4-135
midendword \x0D3E\x0D15\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 4-246


### Section 14 
endword \x0D41\x0D02 156
endword \x0D32\x0D4D\x200D 346
endword \x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 124

endword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D4D 13-1
endword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D4D 1245-1
endword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D4D 346-1
endword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D4D 14-1
endword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D4D 245-1
endword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D4D 25-1
endword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D4D 23456-1
endword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D4D 1246-1
endword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D4D 3456-1
endword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D 2345-1
endword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D4D 145-1
endword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D4D 1345-1
endword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4D 1234-1
endword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D4D 12-1
endword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D4D 134-1
endword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D4D 123-1
endword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D4D 234-1
endword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D4D 456-1
endword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D 12456-1
endword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D4D 1236-1


### Section 15 - Dot-6
endword \x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D23\x0D02 6-345-246
endword \x0D3F\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D23\x0D02 6-24-246
endword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D23\x0D02 6-246

### Section 16 - Dot-5
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D46\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-124
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D46\x0D1F\x0D41\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 5-1356

### Section 17 
midendword \x0D24\x0D3F\x0D28\x0D3E\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D 4-1
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 4-1346
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 4-135
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 4-124

endword \x0D46\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3F\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D 4-26


### Section 18
midendword \x0D33\x0D3E\x0D2F 23-34
midendword \x0D41\x0D1F\x0D46 5-136
midendword \x0D42\x0D1F\x0D46 5-1256
midendword \x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D2F 3-34

### Section 19 
### To be fixed - Not included due to complication

### Section 20

midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D46 1356-26
endword \x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D4D 124-124

# Dot-3 
endword \x0D3E\x0D23\x0D4D 345-3
endword \x0D3F\x0D28\x0D4D 24-3
endword \x0D40\x0D1F\x0D4D 35-3
endword \x0D41\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D4D 136-3
endword \x0D42\x0D1F\x0D4D 1256-3
endword \x0D46\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D 26-3
endword \x0D47\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 15-3
endword \x0D4B\x0D1F\x0D4D 135-3


### Section 21 & 22
sufword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D3F\x0D1F\x0D46 6-1
sufword \x0D05\x0D24\x0D41\x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 6-1-13
sufword \x0D05\x0D24\x0D41\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D32 6-1-1234
sufword \x0D06\x0D2F\x0D24\x0D41\x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 6-345-13-1346
sufword \x0D07\x0D35\x0D3F\x0D1F\x0D46 6-24
sufword \x0D07\x0D24\x0D41\x0D2A\x0D4B\x0D32 6-24-1234
sufword \x0D07\x0D24\x0D41\x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 6-24-13
sufword \x0D09\x0D26\x0D3E\x0D39\x0D30 6-136
sufword \x0D0E\x0D35\x0D3F\x0D1F\x0D46 6-26
sufword \x0D0E\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D41\x0D15\x0D4A\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 6-26-13
sufword \x0D0E\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 6-26-1234
sufword \x0D0E\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4A\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D46\x0D2F\x0D41\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 6-26-136
sufword \x0D12\x0D30\x0D41 6-1346
sufword \x0D14\x0D37\x0D27 6-246
sufword \x0D05\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D28\x0D46 6-346-26
sufword \x0D1C\x0D28\x0D3E\x0D27\x0D3F\x0D2A\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F 6-245-1234
sufword \x0D24\x0D3E\x0D34 6-2345-13-1346
sufword \x0D24\x0D3E\x0D34 6-2345-2345
sufword \x0D24\x0D3E\x0D34 6-2345-1234
sufword \x0D28\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D40\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37\x0D3F 6-1345-24
sufword \x0D2A\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37\x0D46 6-1234
sufword \x0D2A\x0D3F\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D40\x0D1F 6-1234-24
sufword \x0D2E\x0D41\x0D24\x0D32\x0D3E\x0D2F 6-134-136
sufword \x0D2E\x0D41\x0D15\x0D33\x0D3F\x0D32\x0D4D 6-134-136-1234
sufword \x0D2E\x0D47\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D31\x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E 6-134-15-1234
sufword \x0D38\x0D42\x0D30\x0D4D\x0D2F 6-234-1256
sufword \x0D38\x0D02\x0D2C\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D27\x0D3F\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A 6-234-14
sufword \x0D2D\x0D42\x0D2E\x0D3F 6-45-1256
sufword \x0D1A\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D30 6-14-1356
sufword \x0D38\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4B\x0D37 6-234-56
sufword \x0D1E\x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 6-25-345
sufword \x0D24\x0D3F\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 6-2345-24
sufword \x0D1A\x0D4A\x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35 6-14-1346
sufword \x0D2C\x0D41\x0D27\x0D28\x0D4D\x200D 6-12-136
sufword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D34\x0D02 6-4-1236-13456-345
sufword \x0D35\x0D46\x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D3F 6-1236-26
sufword \x0D36\x0D28\x0D3F 6-146
sufword \x0D1C\x0D28\x0D41\x0D35\x0D30\x0D3F 6-245
sufword \x0D2B\x0D46\x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D41\x0D35\x0D30\x0D3F 6-235-26
sufword \x0D2E\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D4D 6-134-345
sufword \x0D0F\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D40\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D 6-15-4-1234
sufword \x0D2F\x0D4D 6-134-26
sufword \x0D1C\x0D42\x0D23\x0D4D\x200D 6-245-136
sufword \x0D1C\x0D42\x0D32\x0D3E\x0D2F\x0D4D 6-245-1256
sufword \x0D06\x0D17\x0D38\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D 6-345-1245
sufword \x0D38\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 6-234
sufword \x0D12\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4B\x0D2C\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 6-135
sufword \x0D28\x0D35\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 6-1345
sufword \x0D21\x0D3F\x0D38\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 6-1246-24
 
sufword \x0D38\x0D4D 2
midword \x0D38\x0D4D 2

midendword \x0D33\x0D41\x0D02 456-156

endword , 2

letsign 3456

midword \x0D2B 235 MALAYALAM LETTER PHA
sufword \x0D2B 235 MALAYALAM LETTER PHA

midword \x0D1D 356 MALAYALAM LETTER JHA
sufword \x0D1D 356 MALAYALAM LETTER JHA

# punctuation followed by double quote
endword \x002C\x0022 2-356
endword \x0021\x0022 235-356
endword \x002E\x0022 256-356
endword \x003F\x0022 236-356

endword \x0D2B\x0D4D 235-3 SIGN VIRAMA followed by MALAYALAM LETTER PHA 

# SIGN VIRAMA followed by MALAYALAM LETTER in middle and end
midword  \x0D15\x0D4D\x200D		3-13 # MALAYALAM LETTER KA
midword  \x0D16\x0D4D\x200D		3-46 # MALAYALAM LETTER KHA
midword  \x0D17\x0D4D\x200D		3-1245 # MALAYALAM LETTER GA
midword  \x0D18\x0D4D\x200D		3-126 # MALAYALAM LETTER GHA
midword  \x0D19\x0D4D\x200D		3-346 # MALAYALAM LETTER NGA

midword  \x0D1A\x0D4D\x200D	3-14 # MALAYALAM LETTER CA= CHA
midword  \x0D1B\x0D4D\x200D	3-16 # MALAYALAM LETTER CHA= CHHA
midword  \x0D1C\x0D4D\x200D	3-245 # MALAYALAM LETTER JA
midword  \x0D1D\x0D4D\x200D	3-356 # MALAYALAM LETTER JHA
midword  \x0D1E\x0D4D\x200D	3-25 # MALAYALAM LETTER NYA= NHA

midword  \x0D1F\x0D4D\x200D	3-23456 # MALAYALAM LETTER TTA= TA
midword  \x0D20\x0D4D\x200D	    3-2456 # MALAYALAM LETTER TTHA= TTA
midword  \x0D21\x0D4D\x200D		3-1246 # MALAYALAM LETTER DDA= HARD DA
midword  \x0D22\x0D4D\x200D		3-123456 # MALAYALAM LETTER DDHA= HARD DDA
midendword  \x0D23\x0D4D\x200D		3-3456 # MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA

midword  \x0D24\x0D4D\x200D		3-2345 # MALAYALAM LETTER TA= THA
midword  \x0D25\x0D4D\x200D		3-1456 # MALAYALAM LETTER THA= TTHA
midword  \x0D26\x0D4D\x200D		3-145 # MALAYALAM LETTER DA= SOFT DA
midword  \x0D27\x0D4D\x200D		3-2346 # MALAYALAM LETTER DHA= SOFT DDA
midendword  \x0D28\x0D4D\x200D		3-1345 # MALAYALAM LETTER NA

midword  \x0D2A\x0D4D\x200D	3-1234 # MALAYALAM LETTER PA
midword  \x0D2B\x0D4D\x200D	3-235 # MALAYALAM LETTER PHA
midword  \x0D2C\x0D4D\x200D	3-12 # MALAYALAM LETTER BA
midword  \x0D2D\x0D4D\x200D	3-45 # MALAYALAM LETTER BHA
midword  \x0D2E\x0D4D\x200D	3-134 # MALAYALAM LETTER MA

midword  \x0D2F\x0D4D\x200D	3-13456 # MALAYALAM LETTER YA
midword  \x0D31\x0D4D\x200D		3-1235 # MALAYALAM LETTER RA
midendword  \x0D30\x0D4D\x200D		3-12456 # MALAYALAM LETTER RRA
midendword  \x0D32\x0D4D\x200D		3-123 # MALAYALAM LETTER LA
midendword  \x0D33\x0D4D\x200D		3-456 # MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
midword  \x0D34\x0D4D\x200D		3-12356 # MALAYALAM LETTER LLLA= ZHA
midword  \x0D35\x0D4D\x200D		3-1236 # MALAYALAM LETTER VA
midword  \x0D36\x0D4D\x200D		3-146 # MALAYALAM LETTER SHA= SOFT SHA
midword  \x0D37\x0D4D\x200D		3-12346 # MALAYALAM LETTER SSA= SHA
midword  \x0D38\x0D4D\x200D		3-234 # MALAYALAM LETTER SA
midword  \x0D39\x0D4D\x200D		3-125 # MALAYALAM LETTER HA


# SIGN VIRAMA followed by MALAYALAM LETTER in middle and end
sufword  \x0D15\x0D4D\x200D		3-13 # MALAYALAM LETTER KA
sufword  \x0D16\x0D4D\x200D		3-46 # MALAYALAM LETTER KHA
sufword  \x0D17\x0D4D\x200D		3-1245 # MALAYALAM LETTER GA
sufword  \x0D18\x0D4D\x200D		3-126 # MALAYALAM LETTER GHA
sufword  \x0D19\x0D4D\x200D		3-346 # MALAYALAM LETTER NGA

sufword  \x0D1A\x0D4D\x200D		3-14 # MALAYALAM LETTER CA= CHA
sufword  \x0D1B\x0D4D\x200D		3-16 # MALAYALAM LETTER CHA= CHHA
sufword  \x0D1C\x0D4D\x200D		3-245 # MALAYALAM LETTER JA
sufword  \x0D1D\x0D4D\x200D		3-356 # MALAYALAM LETTER JHA
sufword  \x0D1E\x0D4D\x200D		3-25 # MALAYALAM LETTER NYA= NHA

sufword  \x0D1F\x0D4D\x200D		3-23456 # MALAYALAM LETTER TTA= TA
sufword  \x0D20\x0D4D\x200D	    3-2456 # MALAYALAM LETTER TTHA= TTA
sufword  \x0D21\x0D4D\x200D		3-1246 # MALAYALAM LETTER DDA= HARD DA
sufword  \x0D22\x0D4D\x200D		3-123456 # MALAYALAM LETTER DDHA= HARD DDA
sufword  \x0D23\x0D4D\x200D		3-3456 # MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA

sufword  \x0D24\x0D4D\x200D		3-2345 # MALAYALAM LETTER TA= THA
sufword  \x0D25\x0D4D\x200D		3-1456 # MALAYALAM LETTER THA= TTHA
sufword  \x0D26\x0D4D\x200D		3-145 # MALAYALAM LETTER DA= SOFT DA
sufword  \x0D27\x0D4D\x200D		3-2346 # MALAYALAM LETTER DHA= SOFT DDA
sufword  \x0D28\x0D4D\x200D		3-1345 # MALAYALAM LETTER NA

sufword  \x0D2A\x0D4D\x200D		3-1234 # MALAYALAM LETTER PA
sufword  \x0D2B\x0D4D\x200D		3-235 # MALAYALAM LETTER PHA
sufword  \x0D2C\x0D4D\x200D		3-12 # MALAYALAM LETTER BA
sufword  \x0D2D\x0D4D\x200D		3-45 # MALAYALAM LETTER BHA
sufword  \x0D2E\x0D4D\x200D		3-134 # MALAYALAM LETTER MA
